Utah statutes.
63A-11-201.   Child welfare parental defense contracts -- Qualifications.

(1)  The department may enter into contracts with qualified parental defense attorneys to provide services for an indigent parent or parents who are the subject of a petition alleging abuse, neglect, or dependency, and will require a parental defense attorney under Section 78A-6-1111.

(2)  Payment for the representation, costs, and expenses of a contracted parental defense attorney shall be made from the Child Welfare Parental Defense Fund as provided in Section 63A-11-203.

(3)  The parental defense attorney shall maintain the minimum qualifications as provided by this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 265, 2011 General Session

